Maine, session 132, LD1993.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §61, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2013, c. 467, §2, is further
amended to read:
2. Source of funds. The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall annually
assess a levy based on actual annual workers' compensation paid losses, excluding medical
payments, paid in the most recent calendar year for which data is available by employers
under former Title 39, the Workers' Compensation Act or Title 39‑A, Part 1, the Maine
Workers' Compensation Act of 1992. As soon as practicable after July 1st of each year,
the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall assess upon and collect from each
insurance carrier licensed to do workers' compensation business in the State, and each
group and individual self-insured employer authorized to make workers' compensation
payments directly to their employees, a sum equal to that proportion of the current fiscal
year's appropriation, exclusive of any federal funds, for the safety education and training
program that the total workers' compensation benefits, exclusive of medical payments, paid
by each licensed carrier or each group or individual self-insured employer, bear to the total
of the benefits paid by all licensed carriers, and group and individual self-insured employers
during the most recent calendar year for which data is available, except that the total amount
levied annually may not exceed 1% 2% of the total of the compensation benefits paid by
all licensed carriers, and group and individual self-insured employers during the most
recent calendar year for which data is available. A licensed carrier or group or individual
self-insured must be assessed based on all benefits paid, exclusive of medical payments,
during any year for which the carrier was licensed or the group or individual self-insured
employer was authorized to make workers' compensation payments directly to their
employees for any portion of the year.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
Safety Education and Training Programs 0161
Page 1 - 132LR2690(04)

Initiative: Allocates funds to the Department of Labor to support safety education and
training programs for employers, owners, employees, educators and students.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,230,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $2,230,000
Page 2 - 132LR2690(04)